Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1307
Board; members; qualifications; terms.

The board shall consist of six members. One member shall be a public member who meets the requirements of section 38-165. Each of the other members shall have been engaged in environmental health for at least ten years, shall have had responsible charge of work for at least five years at the time of his or her appointment, and shall be a registered environmental health specialist. At the expiration of the three-year terms of the members serving on December 1, 2008, successors shall be appointed for five-year terms.

Laws 1963, c. 400, § 6, p. 1281;

Laws 1969, c. 578, § 1, p. 2326;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 127;

Laws 1987, LB 473, § 49;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 43;

Laws 1993, LB 375, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 46;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 667;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3706;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 579;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 528.